Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.710

Originals and automated files—Public disclosure.

(1) The county auditor shall have custody of the original voter registration records and voter registration sign up records for each county. The original voter registration form must be filed without regard to precinct and is considered confidential and unavailable for public inspection and copying. An automated file of all registered voters must be maintained pursuant to RCW 29A.08.125. An auditor may maintain the automated file in lieu of filing or maintaining the original voter registration forms if the automated file includes all of the information from the original voter registration forms including, but not limited to, a retrievable facsimile of each voter's signature.

(2)(a) The following information contained in voter registration records or files regarding a voter or a group of voters is available for public inspection and copying, except as provided in RCW 40.24.060 and (b) of this subsection: The voter's name, address, political jurisdiction, gender, year of birth, voting record, date of registration, and registration number. No other information from voter registration records or files is available for public inspection or copying.

(b) Disclosure of information on individuals under the age of 18 is subject to RCW 29A.08.725.

[ 2023 c 466 s 27; 2023 c 361 s 7; 2018 c 109 s 10; 2005 c 246 s 17; 2004 c 267 s 133; 2003 c 111 s 246; 1994 c 57 s 17; 1991 c 81 s 21; 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 17; 1965 c 9 s 29.07.130. Prior: 1933 c 1 s 13, part; RRS s 5114-13, part. Formerly RCW 29.07.130.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2023 c 361 s 7 and by 2023 c 466 s 27, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 109: See notes following RCW 29A.08.170.

Effective date—2005 c 246: See note following RCW 10.64.140.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Severability—1994 c 57: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.